Missouri, session 2026, HB2112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 168, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 168.481, to read as follows:
168.481. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Teachers Matter Grant Program".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "MTM district grant", an amount of moneys that:
(a) Consists of:
a. Up to one thousand dollars of moneys appropriated by the state for such
purpose; and
b. Up to one thousand dollars of moneys from school district funds as a matching
grant; and
(b) Is awarded to a teacher by the school district employing such teacher if such
teacher renews a contract to teach in such school district before June first of the school
year;
(2) "MTM state grant", an amount of appropriated moneys that:
(a) Does not exceed four thousand dollars; and
(b) Is awarded to a qualified teacher under this section;
(3) "Qualified teacher", an individual who:
(a) Has received a valid certificate of license to teach under this chapter;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2112 2
(b) Receives annual compensation for services rendered as a teacher under the
salary schedule adopted by the school board of a school district in this state;
(c) Received a ranking of satisfactory or higher on the individual's most recent
classroom performance evaluations performed under section 168.128;
(d) Does not receive a supplement to such individual's teacher salary under the
teacher baseline salary grant program established under section 163.172; and
(e) Completes additional self-directed duties beyond the scope of the individual's
teacher contract as described in subsection 4 of this section.
3. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, subject to
appropriations, a school district may award:
(1) An MTM district grant to a teacher employed by the school district as
follows:
(a) The amount of the moneys appropriated by the state that are disbursed as
part of the MTM district grant shall be the same amount as moneys provided from
school district funds as a matching grant; and
(b) The MTM district grant shall be distributed to such teacher after May
thirty-first of the school year; and
(2) An MTM state grant to a qualified teacher employed by the school district as
follows:
(a) The first half of such MTM state grant shall be two thousand dollars and
shall be distributed to such qualified teacher between December first and January
fifteenth of the school year after completion of at least forty hours of self-directed duties
under subsection 4 of this section; and
(b) The second half of such MTM state grant shall be two thousand dollars and
shall be distributed to such qualified teacher between May first and June fifteenth of the
school year after completion of at least forty hours of self-directed duties under
subsection 4 of this section.
4. (1) As used in this subsection, "self-directed duties" includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) Serving as a coach, supervisor, or organizer for any extracurricular activity
for which the qualified teacher does not already receive additional compensation;
(b) Serving as a mentor for students or teachers, in a formal or informal
capacity, for which the qualified teacher does not already receive additional
compensation;
(c) Receiving additional teacher training or certification outside of such training
or certification required by or compensated for by the school district;
(d) Serving as a tutor or providing additional learning opportunities to students;

HB 2112 3
(e) Assisting students with postsecondary education preparation including, but
not limited to, teaching an ACT or SAT preparation course or assisting students with
completing college or career school admission or financial assistance applications; and
(f) Serving as an organizer, presenter, or supervisor of any student, community,
parent, or staff event that improves academic, community, or personal outcomes for any
of such entities.
(2) To receive an MTM state grant, a qualified teacher shall:
(a) Sign a written agreement between the school district and the qualified
teacher that indicates the number of hours of additional self-directed duties beyond the
scope of the individual's teacher contract that a qualified teacher performed in the four
months immediately before each distribution of MTM state grant moneys as described
in subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section; and
(b) Maintain a written or electronic log or record indicating each self-directed
duty the qualified teacher performed and the number of hours for each self-directed
duty.
(3) A qualified teacher shall produce a log or record maintained under this
subsection upon request by the school board in an isolated case of suspected fraud or
malfeasance as provided in the school district's policies.
5. This section shall not be construed to require a school district to award MTM
district grants to a teacher if such school district has no moneys available for awarding
such MTM district grants.
6. The amount of an MTM district grant offered or awarded under this section
may be subject to negotiations in any collective bargaining process for school district
employee contracts.
7. No MTM district grant or MTM state grant offered or awarded under this
section shall be construed to be a bonus in violation of subdivision (3) of Article III,
Section 39 of the Constitution of Missouri.
8. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔